Nebraska, session 109, LB555.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB555 LB555
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1401 Sections 38-1401 to 38-1428 and sections 3 and 5 to 8 of
this act shall be known and may be cited as the Funeral Directing and
Embalming Practice Act.
Sec. 2. Section 38-1402, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1402 For purposes of the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice
Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1403 to 38-1413
and section 3 of this act apply.
Sec. 3. Assistant funeral director means a person who assists a
funeral director licensed pursuant to the Funeral Directing and Embalming
Practice Act.
Sec. 4. Section 38-1413, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1413 Supervision means the direct oversight or the easy
availability of the supervising funeral director and embalmer. The first
twenty-five funeral assists and embalmings performed by an apprentice
shall be completed under direct onsite supervision of the supervising
funeral director and embalmer.
Sec. 5. To be eligible to enter into a collaborative agreement to
act as an assistant funeral director, an individual shall provide
evidence of successful completion of an approved jurisprudence
examination in Nebraska law.
Sec. 6. Prior to acting as an assistant funeral director, the
assistant funeral director shall be employed by a funeral director
licensed pursuant to the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act and
shall be a party to a signed collaborative agreement with the licensed
funeral director. An assistant funeral director may be so employed by
more than one funeral director in Nebraska by being a party to a signed
-2-

LB555 LB555
2025 2025
collaborative agreement with each licensed funeral director.
Sec. 7. (1) An assistant funeral director may assist a funeral
director licensed pursuant to the Funeral Directing and Embalming
Practice Act with one or more of the principal functions of funeral
directing, including the operation and management of a licensed funeral
establishment. Such principal functions shall include, but not be limited
to, conducting funeral services, arranging interments, working with
families on funeral arrangements, and performing daily management and all
permitted necessary funeral activities related to the operation of a
licensed funeral establishment. The assistant funeral director shall
perform all work under the supervision and control of the licensed
funeral director.
(2) An assistant funeral director shall not engage in any aspect of
the practice of embalming a dead human body. An assistant funeral
director found to be in violation of this subsection shall have any
collaborative agreement in Nebraska immediately terminated and employment
in Nebraska as an assistant funeral director immediately terminated.
Sec. 8. A funeral director who is employing an assistant funeral
director shall enter into a collaborative agreement with the assistant
funeral director, supervise the assistant funeral director, and keep
records of the collaborative agreement and the functions of the assistant
funeral director.
Sec. 9. Section 38-1424, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1424 (1) In addition to the grounds for disciplinary action found
in sections 38-178 and 38-179, a credential issued under the Funeral
Directing and Embalming Practice Act may be denied, refused renewal,
limited, revoked, or suspended or have other disciplinary measures taken
against it in accordance with section 38-196 when the applicant or
credential holder is found guilty of any of the following acts or
offenses:
-3-

LB555 LB555
2025 2025
(a) Solicitation of dead human bodies by the credential holder or
his or her agents, assistants, or employees, either prior to or following
death;
(b) The purchasing of funeral or embalming engagements or the
payment of a commission either directly or indirectly or offer of payment
of such commission to any agent, assistant, or employee for the purpose
of securing business;
(c) Using indecent, profane, or obscene language in the presence of
a dead human body or within the immediate presence or hearing of the
family, relatives, or friends of the deceased prior to the burial of the
deceased;
(d) Soliciting or accepting any remuneration, commission, bonus, or
rebate in consideration of the recommending or causing a dead human body
to be placed in any crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery;
(e) Using any casket or part thereof which has previously been used
as a receptacle for, or in connection with, the shipment, burial, or
other disposition of a dead human body without first identifying such
item as used;
(f) Violations of any state law, municipal ordinance, or rule or
regulation of the department or other body having regulatory powers,
relating to the handling, custody, care, or transportation of dead human
bodies;
(g) Refusal to surrender promptly the custody of a dead human body
upon request of a person or persons lawfully entitled to the custody
thereof; or
(h) Taking undue advantage of a patron or patrons, or being found
guilty of fraud, or misrepresentation in the selling of merchandise or
service to patrons; or .
(i) Failure to comply with section 8 of this act.
(2) An applicant or a credential holder shall be subject to the
penalty provisions of this section if found guilty of any of the
-4-

LB555 LB555
2025 2025
following:
(a) Paying, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of
value as a commission or gratuity for the securing of business;
(b) The buying of a business of any person, firm, or corporation, or
the paying of a commission to any person, firm, or corporation or to any
hospital or any institution where death occurs or to any hospital
superintendent, nurse, intern, or other employee, whether directly or
indirectly; or
(c) Willful malpractice.
(3) Any funeral director and embalmer who commits any of the acts or
things prohibited by this section or otherwise violates any of the
provisions thereof shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
licensed funeral director and embalmer from engaging in sales of funeral
goods or services under the Burial Pre-Need Sale Act.
Sec. 10. Original sections 38-1401, 38-1402, 38-1413, and 38-1424,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 11. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-